Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6833
Forensic DNA laboratories; requirements.

Except as provided under section 81-2010, all forensic DNA laboratories performing work on behalf of the state or a political subdivision shall be accredited by the American Society of Crime Laboratory Directors-LAB-Laboratory Accreditation Board or the National Forensic Science Technology Center or by any other national accrediting body or public agency which has requirements that are substantially equivalent to or more comprehensive than those of the society or center.

Laws 2001, LB 432, § 5.